Tennessee, session 114, SB2359.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 24-7-120, is amended by designating
subsection (a) as subdivision (a)(1) and adding the following new subdivisions:
(2) The child does not need to testify or be present in the courtroom for the trial
judge to make a determination under subdivision (a)(1).
(3) There is a rebuttable presumption that a child under thirteen (13) years of
age would be traumatized by the presence of the defendant and that the emotional
distress suffered by the child would be more than de minimus such that the child could
not reasonably communicate.
(4) Before ordering the testimony of a child to be taken by two-way CCTV, the
trial judge must make a finding that such an order does not unduly prejudice the
defendant.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2359
012009
- 1 -